Maine, session 132, LD1313.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. N, §2
and affected by §3, is amended to read:
B-1. "Commercial wood harvesting" means the commercial severance and, yarding
and hauling of trees for sale or for processing into logs, pulpwood, bolt wood, wood
chips, stud wood, poles, pilings, biomass or fuel wood or other products commonly
known as forest products.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 7, §2, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) New or used machinery and equipment for use directly and primarily in
commercial wood harvesting, including, but not limited to, chain saws, skidders,
delimbers, forwarders, slashers, feller bunchers and, wood chippers, semitrailers
as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 66, trailers as defined in Title
29-A, section 101, subsection 86, trucks as defined in Title 29-A, section 101,
subsection 88, truck tractors as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 90,
pickup trucks as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 55 and commercial
motor vehicles as defined in Title 29-A, section 101, subsection 17.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §2013, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2019, c. 7, §2, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
"Depreciable Except as provided in subparagraph (4), "depreciable machinery and
equipment" does not include a motor vehicle as defined in section 1752, subsection 7
or a trailer as defined in section 1752, subsection 19‑A.
Sec. 4. Application. This Act applies to sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026.